New Jersey, session 221, S1857.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.127 (C.40:48-2.12o) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Hearing officer" means a person designated pursuant to subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.1993, c.127 (C.40:48-2.12p) to hear and determine proceedings under P.L.1993, c.127 (C.40:48-2.12n et seq.). "Landlord" means the person or persons who own or purport to own a building in which there is rented or offered for rent housing space for living or dwelling under either a written or oral lease which building contains no more than four dwelling units, or is the owner or operator of a rooming house or boarding house, as defined by section 3 of P.L.1979, c.496 (C.55:13B-3).  In the case of a mobile home park, "landlord" shall mean the owner of an individual dwelling unit within the mobile home park. "Substantiated complaint" means a complaint which may form the basis for proceedings in accordance with subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.1993, c.127 (C.40:48-2.12q). (cf: P.L.2009, c.170, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be applicable to ordinances adopted on or after the effective date of this act.